Illinois, session 104th, HB2141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Flood Prevention District Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 750/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Flood 8Prevention District Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-719, eff. 5-21-08.)